Maine, session 132, LD678.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Allocation to Treasurer of State. The $5,000,000 of the state ceiling on
private activity bonds for calendar year 2025 previously allocated to the Treasurer of State
remains allocated to the Treasurer of State to be used or reallocated in accordance with the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 10, section 363, subsection 5 for calendar year 2025. Five
million dollars of the state ceiling for calendar year 2026 is allocated to the Treasurer of
State to be used or reallocated in accordance with Title 10, section 363, subsection 5.
Sec. 2. Allocation to Finance Authority of Maine, including as successor to
Maine Educational Loan Authority. The $195,000,000 of the state ceiling on private
activity bonds for calendar year 2025 previously allocated to the Finance Authority of
Maine, including as successor to the Maine Educational Loan Authority, remains allocated
Page 1 - 132LR0139(03)

to the Finance Authority of Maine to be used or reallocated in accordance with the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 10, section 363, subsections 6 and 8 for calendar year 2025. An
additional $75,000,000 of the state ceiling on private activity bonds for calendar year 2025
previously unallocated is allocated to the Finance Authority of Maine to be used or
reallocated in accordance with Title 10, section 363, subsections 6 and 8 for calendar year
2025. Two hundred thirty-five million dollars of the state ceiling for calendar year 2026 is
allocated to the Finance Authority of Maine to be used or reallocated in accordance with
Title 10, section 363, subsections 6 and 8.
Sec. 3. Allocation to Maine Municipal Bond Bank. The $10,000,000 of the
state ceiling on private activity bonds for calendar year 2025 previously allocated to the
Maine Municipal Bond Bank remains allocated to the Maine Municipal Bond Bank to be
used or reallocated in accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 10, section 363,
subsection 7 for calendar year 2025. Ten million dollars of the state ceiling for calendar
year 2026 is allocated to the Maine Municipal Bond Bank to be used or reallocated in
accordance with Title 10, section 363, subsection 7.
Sec. 4. Allocation to Maine State Housing Authority. The $100,000,000 of
the state ceiling on private activity bonds for calendar year 2025 previously allocated to the
Maine State Housing Authority remains allocated to the Maine State Housing Authority to
be used or reallocated in accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 10, section 363,
subsection 4 for calendar year 2025. One hundred million dollars of the state ceiling for
calendar year 2026 is allocated to the Maine State Housing Authority to be used or
reallocated in accordance with Title 10, section 363, subsection 4.
Sec. 5. Unallocated state ceiling. Three million seven hundred eighty thousand
dollars of the state ceiling on private activity bonds for calendar year 2025 is unallocated
and must be reserved for future allocation in accordance with applicable laws. Thirty-eight
million seven hundred eighty thousand dollars of the state ceiling for calendar year 2026 is
unallocated and must be reserved for future allocation in accordance with applicable laws.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR0139(03)